Florida, session 2026, SB1424.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 68 69 Section 1.âSection 44.104, Florida Statutes, is amended to 70 read: 71 (Substantial rewording of section. See 72 s. 44.104, F.S., for present text.) 73 44.104âVoluntary trial resolution.â 74 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âpresiding judgeâ 75 means the judge assigned to the case. 76 (2)(a)âThe parties to a civil case, a family law case, or a 77 probate case may by written agreement or stipulation agree to 78 the appointment of an individual to serve as a voluntary trial 79 resolution judge to adjudicate all of the remaining issues in 80 the case, subject to the exceptions set forth in subsection 81 (12). 82 (b)âTo be eligible to be appointed to serve as a voluntary 83 trial resolution judge, the individual selected by the parties 84 must be a member of The Florida Bar in good standing for longer 85 than 5 years. 86 (c)âAny time after an action is filed, the parties may file 87 a written agreement or stipulation to appoint a voluntary trial 88 resolution judge with the clerk of the court in which the action 89 is pending and may file a joint motion requesting appointment of 90 a voluntary trial resolution judge, selecting the individual 91 whom the parties wish to have appointed. The joint motion must 92 be accompanied by a form signed by the selected voluntary trial 93 resolution judge consenting to the appointment. The parties 94 shall promptly serve a copy of the joint motion and form on the 95 presiding judge. 96 (d)âWithin 10 days after the submission of the request for 97 appointment of a voluntary trial resolution judge, the presiding 98 judge shall enter an order appointing the voluntary trial 99 resolution judge selected by the parties. The order designating 100 the voluntary trial resolution judge must be signed by the 101 presiding judge, refer to the partiesâ written agreement or 102 stipulation, and provide that the voluntary trial resolution 103 judge be compensated by the parties in accordance with the terms 104 of the partiesâ agreement or stipulation. 105 (e)âA voluntary trial resolution judge appointed under this 106 subsection shall take and subscribe to an oath of office, 107 swearing or affirming that he or she has read and will conform 108 with Canons 1, 2A, and 3, and any other provisions of the 109 Florida Code of Judicial Conduct which might reasonably be 110 applicable depending on the nature of the judicial function 111 performed, except for provisions relating to disqualification 112 and recusal which are provided for in subsection (3). 113 (f)âUpon appointment by the presiding judge, a voluntary 114 trial resolution judge shall adjudicate the case until the case 115 is finally determined by adjudication, including posttrial 116 motions and requests for attorney fees, dismissal, or other 117 final disposition, unless disqualification or recusal is 118 required pursuant to subsection (3). 119 (g)âIf a voluntary trial resolution judge appointed under 120 this subsection cannot serve in that capacity for any reason, 121 absent further agreement or stipulation by the parties to 122 appoint another individual to serve as voluntary trial 123 resolution judge, the case must be returned to the presiding 124 judge. 125 (3)âWhere circumstances exist that require disqualification 126 of a judge under Canon 3E of the Florida Code of Judicial 127 Conduct, a voluntary trial resolution judge must immediately 128 disclose, on the record, to the parties the grounds for 129 disqualification. The parties may waive the disqualification by 130 filing a written waiver with the clerk of the court within 10 131 days after such disclosure. This subsection does not limit the 132 authority of a voluntary trial resolution judge to enter an 133 order of recusal. Sections 38.02 and 38.10 and Florida Rules of 134 General Practice and Judicial Administration 2.330 apply to any 135 motion to disqualify a voluntary trial resolution judge. In the 136 event of recusal, or if a motion to disqualify a voluntary trial 137 resolution judge is granted, the case must be returned to the 138 presiding judge. 139 (4)âA voluntary trial resolution judge shall be compensated 140 by the parties in such amount, and subject to such terms and 141 conditions, as provided by the parties in a written agreement or 142 stipulation. A contract for the services of a voluntary trial 143 resolution judge must provide for payment of compensation by the 144 parties to the voluntary trial judge. The presiding judge may 145 enforce the terms of a written agreement or stipulation against 146 the parties, and shall retain jurisdiction to enforce such 147 agreement or stipulation after entry of any judgment therefrom. 148 (5)âThe clerk of the court shall treat cases referred to 149 voluntary trial resolution the same as any other comparable 150 action, except that the clerk of court shall keep separate the 151 records of the applications for voluntary trial resolution from 152 all other comparable actions. The chief judge or his or her 153 designee shall, upon request of the parties, make available 154 public facilities and personnel in proceedings assigned to a 155 voluntary trial judge to the same extent as for other comparable 156 matters not assigned to a voluntary trial judge. For proceedings 157 requiring a jury to be empaneled, the chief judge and the clerk 158 of the court shall coordinate the provision of jurors with the 159 voluntary trial resolution judge. For all other proceedings, the 160 parties may agree to use facilities other than circuit or county 161 court facilities. The parties are responsible for any 162 compensation to personnel and any costs in relation to the case, 163 including, but not limited to, the costs associated with the use 164 of such facilities and any materials that are not provided by 165 the court. 166 (6)âA voluntary trial resolution judge shall perform all 167 judicial functions from the time of appointment by the presiding 168 judge until the case is finally determined by adjudication, 169 including posttrial motions and requests for attorney fees, 170 dismissal, or other final disposition, except for the 171 disposition of a request that a party be held in contempt and 172 the entry of an order with respect to any nonparty to the case. 173 The presiding judge shall maintain jurisdiction to exercise 174 contempt power and to enforce a subpoena issued to any nonparty 175 to the case. The presiding judge shall have exclusive 176 jurisdiction over enforcement of any judgment and any 177 supplementary proceedings filed in the same action. 178 (7)âA voluntary trial resolution judge shall conduct 179 proceedings under this section pursuant to the Florida Rules of 180 Civil Procedure, the Family Law Rules of Procedure, or the 181 Probate Rules, as applicable. 182 (8)âThe Florida Evidence Code applies to all proceedings 183 under this section. 184 (9)âVoluntary trial resolution proceedings shall be noticed 185 and open to the public to the same extent as if such proceedings 186 were before the presiding judge. 187 (10)âA party may seek review of a nonfinal order or a final 188 judgment rendered by a voluntary trial resolution judge in the 189 same manner as a nonfinal order or a final judgment rendered by 190 the presiding judge. The harmless error doctrine applies in any 191 such review. A party may not seek to have an order or ruling of 192 a voluntary trial judge reviewed, modified, or overturned by the 193 presiding judge during the voluntary trial resolution judgeâs 194 appointment. 195 (11)âExcept as provided in subsection (12), voluntary trial 196 resolution is available in all civil, family, and probate cases. 197 (12)âThis section does not apply to any dispute involving 198 the constitutionality of a statute; child custody, visitation, 199 or child support; or to any dispute involving the rights of a 200 third party who is not a party to the voluntary trial resolution 201 proceedings when the third party would be an indispensable party 202 if the dispute were resolved in court or when the third party 203 notifies the voluntary trial resolution judge that the third 204 party would be a proper party if the dispute were resolved in 205 court, that the third party intends to intervene in the action, 206 and that the third party does not agree to proceed under this 207 section. 208 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 44.107, Florida 209 Statutes, is amended to read: 210 44.107âImmunity for arbitrators, voluntary trial resolution 211 judges, mediators, and mediator trainees.â 212 (1)âArbitrators serving under s. 44.103, voluntary trial 213 resolution judges serving under or s. 44.104, mediators serving 214 under s. 44.102, and trainees fulfilling the mentorship 215 requirements for certification by the Supreme Court as a 216 mediator shall have judicial immunity in the same manner and to 217 the same extent as a judge. 218 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.